Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
PART 3
ORDINANCES - PENALTIES

30-35-301. Duty to make and publish ordinances.

A county adopting any of the home rule powers under this article shall make and publish, from time to time, ordinances, not inconsistent with the laws of the state, for carrying into effect or discharging the powers and duties conferred by this article and as seems necessary and proper to provide for the safety, preserve the health, promote the prosperity, and improve the morals, order, comfort, and convenience of such county and the inhabitants thereof. Such ordinances may be in addition to those authorized by section 30-15-401, and the provisions of sections 30-15-402 to 30-15-411 shall also apply to such ordinances.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1473, § 1, effective June 8.